Washington statutes.
RCW 42.40.910

Application of chapter.

Chapter 266, Laws of 2008 and chapter 361, Laws of 1999 do not affect the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board, the executive ethics board, or the commission on judicial conduct, as set forth in chapter 42.52 RCW. The senate, the house of representatives, and the supreme court shall adopt policies regarding the applicability of chapter 42.40 RCW to the senate, house of representatives, and judicial branch.

[ 2008 c 266 s 9; 1999 c 361 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 266: See note following RCW 42.40.020.